North Dakota, session 69, SB2072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 32-12.2-15 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. An agency may purchase routine or standardized products that contain adhesive contract
terms in shrink wrap documents, third-party end user license, or click-through agreements that
are not consistent with this section if the agency, in consultation with the attorney general's
office and the office of management and budget, determines the purchase poses no
reasonable risk that an improper contractual obligation will be imposed against the agency or
of loss that cannot be limited under this section given the nature of the product's intended use,
including data and system security. Routine or standardized products are products that are
commercially available to the public which do not exceed one thousandtwenty thousand
dollars in cost.

S. B. NO. 2072 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2072.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State